Utah statutes.
39-1-24.   Duties of assistant adjutants general.

(1)  The assistant adjutant general detailed for permanent duty shall serve in the office of the adjutant general, performing duties assigned him by the adjutant general.  In the absence or disability of the adjutant general he shall perform the duties of the adjutant general, unless otherwise delegated by the adjutant general to another qualified officer.  The assistant adjutant general detailed for permanent duty shall serve with pay from the state.

(2)  The assistant adjutant general not detailed for permanent duty in the office of the adjutant general shall serve without pay from the state and perform duties assigned him by the adjutant general.

